en: E512, Stannous chloride, Tin chloride, Tin(II) chloride
xx: E512
bg: E512, Калаен хлорид, Стано хлорид
ca: E512, Clorur estannós, chlorur estannos
cs: E512, Chlorid cínatý, Stannous chloride
da: E512, Stannochlorid, Tinchlorid
de: E512, Zinn(ii)-chlorid, Zinnchlorid
el: E512, Χλωριουχος κασσιτερος(ιι), Χλωριούχος κασσίστερος
es: E512, Cloruro de estaño, Cloruro de estaño, Cloruro de estaño (II)
et: E512, Tinakloriid, Tinakloriiddihüdraat
fi: E512, Tinakloridi, Tina(II)kloridi, Tinakloridia, Tina(II)kloridia
fr: E512, Chlorure stanneux, chlorure d'étain, chlorure d'étain(II), sel d'étain ou dichlorure d'étain, Dichlorure d'étain, Tin (II) dichloride, CI 77864, sel d'étain, dichlorure d'étain
hu: E512, Ón-klorid, Ón(II)-klorid
it: E512, Stannous cloruri, Cloruro di stagno, Cloruro stannoso
lt: E512, Alavo chloridas, Alavo chloridas
lv: E512, Alvas hlorīds, Alvas hlorīds
mt: E512, Klorur stannuż, Klorur tal-landa
nl: E512, Tin(ii)chloride, Tinchloride
pl: E512, Chlorek cynawy, Chlorek cyny (II)
pt: E512, Cloreto estanoso, Cloreto de estanho, Cloreto de estanho (II)
ro: E512, Clorură stanoasă, Clorură de staniu
sk: E512, Chlorid cínatý, Chlorid cínatý
sl: E512, Kositrov (ii) klorid, kositrov klorid
sv: E512, Tennklorid, Tenn(II)klorid

en: E513, Sulphuric acid, Oil of vitriol, sulfuric acid, H2SO4
xx: E513
bg: E513, Сярна киселина
ca: E513, Àcid sulfúric, acid sulfuric
cs: E513, Kyselina sírová
da: E513, Svovlsyre
de: E513, Schwefelsäure, Vitriolöl
el: E513, Θειικο οξυ, Έλαιο βιτριολίου
es: E513, Ácido sulfúrico, Aceite de vitriolo
et: E513, Väävelhape
fi: E513, Rikkihappo, Rikkihappoa
fr: E513, Acide sulfurique, Huile de vitriol
hu: E513, Kénsav, Vitriol
it: E513, Acido solforico, Olio di vetriolo
lt: E513, Sulfato rūgštis, Sieros rūgštis
lv: E513, Sērskābe, Vitriola eļļa
mt: E513, Aċidu sulfuriku, Żejt tal-vitrijol
nl: E513, Zwavelzuur, Vitriool
pl: E513, Kwas siarkowy, Stężony kwas siarkowy
pt: E513, Ácido sulfúrico, Óleo de vitríolo
ro: E513, Acid sulfuric, Vitriol
sk: E513, Kyselina sírová, Vitriolový olej
sl: E513, Žveplova (vi) kislina, Oil of vitriol, Žveplova kislina
sv: E513, Svavelsyra, Vitriololja, vitriolsyra

en: E514, Sodium sulphates
xx: E514
af: E514, Natriumsulfate
ar: E514, كبريتات الصوديوم
az: E514, Natrium sulfatlar
bg: E514, Натриеви сулфати
ca: E514, Sulfats de sodi
cs: E514, Sírany sodné
da: E514, Natriumsulfater
de: E514, Natriumsulfater
el: E514, Θειικά άλατα νατρίου
eo: E514, Natriaj sulfatoj
es: E514, Sulfatos de sodio
et: E514, Naatriumsulfaadid
eu: E514, Sodio sulfatoak
fa: E514, سولفات سدیم
fi: E514, Natriumsulfaatit
fr: E514, Sulfates de sodium
gl: E514, Sulfatos de sodio
he: E514, סולפטים של נתרן
hi: E514, सोडियम सल्फेट
hr: E514, Natrijevi sulfati
hu: E514, Nátrium-szulfátok
hy: E514, Նատրիումի սուլֆատներ
id: E514, Natrium sulfat
is: E514, Natríumsúlfat
it: E514, Solfatos di sodio, Solfati di sodio
ja: E514, 硫酸ナトリウム
ka: E514, ნატრიუმის სულფატები
ko: E514, 황산 나트륨
lt: E514, Natrio sulfatai
lv: E514, Nātrija sulfāti
mk: E514, Натриум сулфати
ms: E514, Natrium sulfat
mt: E514, Sulfati tas-sodju
nl: E514, Natriumsulfaten
no: E514, Natriumsulfater
pl: E514, Siarczany sodu
pt: E514, Sulfatos de sódio
ro: E514, Sulfati de sodiu, Sulfati de natriu
ru: E514, Сульфаты натрия
sk: E514, sirany sodné
sl: E514, Natrijevi sulfati
sq: E514, Sulfatet e natriumit
sr: E514, Натријум сулфати
sv: E514, natriumsulfater
th: E514, โซเดียมซัลเฟต
tr: E514, Sodyum sülfatlar
uk: E514, Сульфати натрію
vi: E514, Natri sulfat
zh: E514, 硫酸钠

en: E514(i), Sodium sulphate
xx: E514(i)
bg: E514(i), Натриев сулфат
ca: E514(i), Sulfat de sodi
cs: E514(i), Síran sodný
da: E514(i), Natriumsulfat
de: E514(i), Natriumsulfat
el: E514(i), Θειικα αλατα του νατριου
es: E514(i), Sulfato sódico
et: E514(i), Naatriumsulfaat
fi: E514(i), Natriumsulfaatti, Natriumsulfaattia
fr: E514(i), Sulfate de sodium
hu: E514(i), Nátrium-szulfát
it: E514(i), Solfato di sodio
lt: E514(i), Natrio sulfatas
lv: E514(i), Nātrija sulfāts, Glaubersāls
mt: E514(i), Sulfat tas-sodju
nl: E514(i), Natriumsulfaat, Glauberzout
pl: E514(i), Siarczan sodu, Sól glauberska
pt: E514(i), Sulfato de sódio, Sal de Glauber
ro: E514(i), Sulfat de sodiu
sk: E514(i), Síran sodný, siran sodný
sl: E514(i), Natrijev sulfat
sv: E514(i), natriumsulfat, Glaubersalt

en: E514(ii), Sodium hydrogen sulphate, Acid sodium sulphate, Sodium bisulphate, sodium bisulfate
xx: E514(ii)
bg: E514(ii), Натриев хидроген сулфат, Кисел натриев сулфат
cs: E514(ii), Hydrogensíran sodný, Kyselý síran sodný
da: E514(ii), Natriumhydrogensulfat, Surt natriumsulfat
de: E514(ii), Natriumhydrogensulfat, saures Natriumsulfat, Natriumbisulfat
el: E514(ii), Οξινο θειικο νατριο, Όξινο θειικό άλας νατρίου
es: E514(ii), Sulfato ácido de sodio, Hidrogenosulfato de sodio
et: E514(ii), Naatriumvesiniksulfaat
fi: E514(ii), Natriumvetysulfaatti, Hapan natriumsulfaatti, natriumbisulfaatti, Natriumvetysulfaattia, natriumbisulfaattia, Glaubersuola, Sal mirabilis, Glauberin suola, Sal mirabile, Glaubersuolaa, Glauberin suolaa
fr: E514(ii), Sulfate acide de sodium, bisulfate de sodium, Hydrogénosulfate de sodium, bisulfate de sodium, Sel de Glauber, Sulfate de soude
hu: E514(ii), Nátrium-hidrogén-szulfát, Savas nátrium-szulfát
it: E514(ii), Solfato acido di sodio
lt: E514(ii), Natrio vandenilio sulfatas, Rūgštusis natrio sulfatas, natrio bisulfatas
lv: E514(ii), Nātrija hidrogēnsulfāts, Skābais nātrija sulfāts, nātrija bisulfāts
mt: E514(ii), Sulfat idroġenat tas-sodju, Sulfat tas-sodju aċiduż, Bisulfat tas-sodju
nl: E514(ii), Natriumwaterstofsulfaat, Zuur natriumsulfaat
pl: E514(ii), Wodorosiarczan sodu, Kwaśny siarczan sodu
pt: E514(ii), Hidrogenossulfato de sódio, Sulfato ácido de sódio
ro: E514(ii), Bisulfat de sodiu, Sulfat acid de sodiu
sk: E514(ii), Hydrogensíran sodný, Kyslý síran sodný, bisulfát sodný
sl: E514(ii), Natrijev hidrogensulfat, kisli natrijev sulfat, natrijev bisulfat
sv: E514(ii), natriumvätesulfat, surt natriumsulfat

en: E515, Potassium sulphates, Potassium sulfates, potassium sulfate
xx: E515
bg: E515, Калиеви сулфати
ca: E515, Sulfats de potassi
cs: E515, Draselné sírany, draselný síran
da: E515, Kaliumsulfater
de: E515, Kaliumsulfate
el: E515, Θειικα αλατα του καλιου, θειικοί αλάτες του καλίου, Θειικά άλατα του καλίου
es: E515, Sulfatos de potasio
et: E515, Kaaliumsulfaadid
fi: E515, Kaliumsulfaatit
fr: E515, Sulfates de potassium
hu: E515, Kálium-szulfátok
it: E515, Solfatos di potassio, Solfati di potassio
lt: E515, Kalio sulfatai
lv: E515, Kālija sulfāti
mt: E515, Sulfati tal-potassju
nl: E515, Kaliumsulfaten
pl: E515, Siarczany potasu
pt: E515, Sulfatos de potássio
ro: E515, Sulfati de potasiu
sk: E515, Draselné sírany, draselný síran
sl: E515, Kalijevi sulfati
sv: E515, Kaliumsulfater

en: E515(i), Potassium sulphate
xx: E515(i)
bg: E515(i), Калиев сулфат
ca: E515(i), Sulfat de potassi
cs: E515(i), Síran draselný
da: E515(i), Kaliumsulfat
de: E515(i), Kaliumsulfat
el: E515(i), Θειικό άλας του καλίου, Θειικός αλάτης του καλίου
es: E515(i), Sulfato potásico, Sulfato de potasio, Sulfito de potasio
et: E515(i), Kaaliumsulfaat
fi: E515(i), Kaliumsulfaatti, Kaliumsulfaattia
fr: E515(i), Sulfate de potassium
hu: E515(i), Kálium-szulfát
it: E515(i), Solfato di potassio, Solfato potassico
lt: E515(i), Kalio sulfatas
lv: E515(i), Kālija sulfāts
mt: E515(i), Sulfat tal-potassju
nl: E515(i), Kaliumsulfaat
pl: E515(i), Siarczan potasu, Siarczan potasowy
pt: E515(i), Sulfato de potássio
ro: E515(i), Sulfat de potasiu
sk: E515(i), Síran draselný
sl: E515(i), Kalijev sulfat
sv: E515(i), Kaliumsulfat

en: E515(ii), Potassium hydrogen sulphate, Potassium bisulphate
xx: E515(ii)
bg: E515(ii), Калиев хидроген сулфат, Калиев бисулфат
cs: E515(ii), Hydrogensíran draselný, Bisulfát draselný
da: E515(ii), Kaliumhydrogensulfat, Kaliumbisulfat
de: E515(ii), Kaliumhydrogensulfat, Kaliumbisulfat
el: E515(ii), Οξινο θειικο καλιο
es: E515(ii), Sulfato ácido de potasio, Bisulfato potásico
et: E515(ii), Kaaliumvesiniksulfaat
fi: E515(ii), Kaliumvetysulfaatti, Kaliumbisulfaatti, Kaliumvetysulfaattia, Kaliumbisulfaattia
fr: E515(ii), Sulfate acide de potassium, Bisulfate de potassium
hu: E515(ii), Kálium-hidrogén-szulfát, Kálium-biszulfát
it: E515(ii), Solfato acido di potassio
lt: E515(ii), Kalio vandenilio sulfatas, Kalio bisulfatas
lv: E515(ii), Kālija hidrogēnsulfāts, Kālija bisulfāts
mt: E515(ii), Sulfat idroġenat tal-potassju, Bisulfat tal-potassju
nl: E515(ii), Kaliumwaterstofsulfaat, Kaliumbisulfaat
pl: E515(ii), Wodorosiarczan potasu, Disiarczan potasu
pt: E515(ii), Hidrogenossulfato de potássio, Bissulfato de potássio
ro: E515(ii), Bisulfat de potasiu
sk: E515(ii), Hydrogensíran draselný, Dvojsíran draselný
sl: E515(ii), Kalijev hidrogensulfat, kalijev bisulfat
sv: E515(ii), Kaliumvätesulfat, Kaliumbisulfat

en: E516, Calcium sulphate, Gypsum, Selenite, Calcium sulfate, calcium sulfate added to prevent caking
xx: E516
ar: E516, كبريتات الكالسيوم
be: E516, сульфат кальцыю
bg: E516, Калциев сулфат, Гипс, селенит
bn: E516, ক্যালসিয়াম ফসফেট
ca: E516, Sulfat de calci
cs: E516, Síran vápenatý, Sádra, sádrovec, CaSO4
da: E516, Calciumsulfat, Gips, selenit
de: E516, Calciumsulfat, Gips, Selenit, Kalziumsulfat, CaSO4
el: E516, Θειικο ασβεστιο, Γύψος, σεληνίτης
es: E516, Sulfato de calcio, Sulfato cálcico, Yeso natural, selenita
et: E516, Kaltsiumsulfaat, Kips
fa: E516, کلسیم سولفات
fi: E516, Kalsiumsulfaatti, Kalsiumsulfaattia
fr: E516, Sulfate de calcium, gypse, Plâtre de Paris, Calcium sulphate, CaSO4
gv: E516, Sulfaayt kelkium
he: E516, סידן גופרתי
hi: E516, कैल्सियम सल्फेट
hu: E516, Kalcium-szulfát, Gipsz, Szelenit
hy: E516, Կալցիումի սուլֆատ
id: E516, Kalsium sulfat
it: E516, Solfato di calcio, Gesso, selenite, Gesso di Parigi, CaSO4
ja: E516, 硫酸カルシウム, 硫酸Ca, 硫酸Ｃａ
kk: E516, Кальций сульфаты
ko: E516, 황산 칼슘
ky: E516, Кальций сульфаты
lt: E516, Kalcio sulfatas, Gipsas, selenitas
lv: E516, Kalcija sulfāts, Ģipsis, selenīts, Anhidrīts, CaSO4
mt: E516, Sulfat tal-kalċju, Ġibs, Selenit
nb: E516, Kalsiumsulfat
nl: E516, Calciumsulfaat, Gips, seleniet
pl: E516, Siarczan wapnia, Gips, selenit, Siarczan(VI) wapnia, CaSO4
pt: E516, Sulfato de cálcio, Gesso, selenite, Caso4
ro: E516, Sulfat de calciu, Ghips, Selenit
sh: E516, Kalcijum sulfat
sk: E516, Síran vápenatý, Sadra, sadrovec
sl: E516, Kalcijev sulfat, Gypsum, selenit
sr: E516, калцијум-сулфат
sv: E516, Kalciumsulfat, Gips, selenit
ta: E516, கால்சியம் சல்பேட்டு
te: E516, కాల్సియం సల్ఫేట్
th: E516, แคลเซียมซัลเฟต
tr: E516, Kalsiyum sülfat
uk: E516, Сульфат кальцію
vi: E516, Canxi sulfat
zh: E516, 硫酸钙

en: E517, Ammonium sulphate, ammonium sulfate
xx: E517
bg: E517, Амониев сулфат
ca: E517, Sulfat d'amoni
cs: E517, Síran amonný, E 517, (NH4)2SO4, N2H8SO4
da: E517, Ammoniumsulfat, Svovlsur ammoniak, Diammoniumsulfat, Svovlsurt ammoniak
de: E517, Ammoniumsulfat, Ammonsulfat, E 517, (NH4)2SO4
el: E517, Θειικο αμμωνιο
es: E517, Sulfato amónico, Sulfato de amonio
et: E517, Ammooniumsulfaat
fi: E517, Ammoniumsulfaatti, Ammoniumsulfaattia
fr: E517, Sulfate d'ammonium, 7783-20-2, Sulfate d'ammoniaque, (NH4)2SO4
hu: E517, Ammónium-szulfát
it: E517, Solfato di ammonio, Solfato d'ammonio, (NH4)2SO4, Solfato ammonico
lt: E517, Amonio sulfatas
lv: E517, Amonija sulfāts
mt: E517, Sulfat tal-ammonju
nl: E517, Ammoniumsulfaat
pl: E517, Siarczan amonu, Siarczan(VI) amonu
pt: E517, Sulfato de amónio, Sulfato de amónia
ro: E517, Sulfat de amoniu
ru: E517, Сульфат аммония, Е517, Аммоний сернокислый, Аммония сульфат
sk: E517, Síran amónny
sl: E517, Amonijev sulfat
sv: E517, Ammoniumsulfat, E 517

en: E518, Magnesium sulphate, Epsom salts, magnesium sulfate
xx: E518
cs: E518, Síran hořečnatý
de: E518, Magnesiumsulfat
es: E518, Sulfato de magnesio
et: E518, Magneesiumsulfaat
fi: E518, Magnesiumsulfaatti, Magnesiumsulfaattia
fr: E518, Sulfate de magnésium
hu: E518, Magnézium-szulfát
it: E518, Solfato di magnesio
lv: E518, Magnija sulfāts
nl: E518, Magnesiumsulfaat
pl: E518, Siarczan magnezu
pt: E518, Sulfato de magnésio
ro: E518, Sulfat de magneziu
sl: E518, Magnezijev sulfat
sv: E518, Magnesiumsulfat

en: E519, Copper sulphate, copper(II) sulfate
xx: E519
bg: E519, Меден сулфат
cs: E519, Síran měďnatý, Modrý vitriol, Cuso4
da: E519, Kobber(II)sulfat, Cubrisulfat, Kobbersulfat
de: E519, Kupfersulfat, Blauer Galitzenstein, Kupfer(II)-sulfat, Blauer Vitriol, CuSO₄
el: E519, Θειικός χαλκός, Βιτριόλι του Σάλτσμπουργκ, Ρωμαϊκό βιτριόλι, Μπλε βιτριόλι, Βιτριόλι του χαλκού, Βιτριόλι της Κύπρου, Γαλαζόπετρα
es: E519, Sulfato de cobre, Sulfato de cobre (II) anhidro, Sulfato cuprico anhidro, Sulfato cúprico, CuSO4
et: E519, Vasksulfaat
fi: E519, Kuparisulfaatti, Kupari(II)sulfaatti, CuSO4·5H2O, Kuparivihtrilli, CuSO4, Kuparisulfaattia, Kupari(II)sulfaattia, Kuparivihtrilliä
fr: E519, Sulfate de cuivre, Sulfate de cuivre pentahydraté, Les dangers du sulfate de cuivre, CuSO4\,5H2O, 7758-98-7, 7758-99-8, Sulfate cuprique, Sulfate de cuivre(II), E 519, CuSO4
hr: E519, bakrov sulfat
hu: E519, Réz-szulfát
it: E519, Solfato rameico, CuSO4·5H2O, Solfato di rame, CuSO4
lv: E519, Vara sulfāts, Vara vitriols
nl: E519, Koper(II)sulfaat, Blauwe vitriool, Wit kopersulfaat, Kopersulfaat
pl: E519, siarczan miedzi(II), siarczan(VI) miedzi(II), siarczan miedziowy
pt: E519, Sulfato de cobre, Cúprico, Sulfato cúprico, CuSO4
ro: E519, Sulfat de cupru, Piatră vânătă
sk: E519, Síran meďnatý, Modrá skalica
sl: E519, Bakrov(II) sulfat, Modra galica, CuSO4, Bakrov sulfat
sv: E519, Kopparsulfat, Koppar(II)sulfat, Kopparvitriol, Blå vitriol, CuSO4

en: E520, Aluminium sulphate, Aluminium sulfate
xx: E520
bg: E520, Алуминиев сулфат
ca: E520, Sulfat d'alumini
cs: E520, Síran hlinitý, Alumen, E 520
da: E520, Aluminiumsulfat
de: E520, Aluminiumsulfat, Schwefelsaure Tonerde, Al2(SO4)3
el: E520, Θειικο αργιλιο
es: E520, Sulfato de aluminio, E 520
et: E520, Alumiiniumsulfaat
fi: E520, Alumiinisulfaatti, Alumiinitrisulfaatti, Aluminiumsulfaatti, Alumiinisulfaattia, Alumiinitrisulfaattia, Aluminiumsulfaattia
fr: E520, Sulfate d'aluminium, Aluminium sulphate, 10043-01-3, E 520, 7784-31-8, Al2(SO4)3
hu: E520, Alumínium-szulfát
it: E520, Solfato di alluminio, Al2(SO4)3
lt: E520, Aliuminio sulfatas
lv: E520, Alumīnija sulfāts
mt: E520, Sulfat tal-aluminju
nl: E520, Aluminiumsulfaat
pl: E520, Siarczan glinu, Siarczan(VI) glinu
pt: E520, Sulfato de alumínio
ro: E520, Sulfat de aluminiu
sk: E520, Síran hlinitý
sl: E520, Aluminijev sulfat
sv: E520, Aluminiumsulfat, E 520

en: E521, Aluminium sodium sulphate, Soda alum, Sodium aluminium sulfate
xx: E521
bg: E521, Алуминиевонатриев сулфат
ca: E521, Sulfat doble d'alumini i sodi
cs: E521, Síran sodno-hlinitý
da: E521, Aluminiumnatriumsulfat
de: E521, Aluminiumnatriumsulfat, Sodaalaun, AlNa(SO4)2, E 521, NaAl(SO4)2, Natronalaun
el: E521, Θειικο αργιλιονατριο, Στυπτηρία σόδας
es: E521, Sulfato de aluminio y sodio, Alumbre de sodio
et: E521, Aluminium sodium sulphate
fi: E521, Alumiininatriumsulfaatti, Alumiininatriumsulfaattia
fr: E521, Sulfate d'aluminium sodique, Alun de soude
hu: E521, Alumínium-nátrium-szulfát
it: E521, Solfato di alluminio e sodio
lt: E521, Aliuminio natrio sulfatas, Sodos alūnas
lv: E521, Alumīnija nātrija sulfāts, Sodas alauns
mt: E521, Sulfat tal-aluminju u tas-sodju, Alum tas-soda
nl: E521, Aluminiumnatriumsulfaat
pl: E521, Siarczan glinowo-sodowy, Ałun sodowy
pt: E521, Sulfato de alumínio e sódio, Alúmen de soda
ro: E521, Sulfat de aluminiu și sodiu, Sodă alaun
sk: E521, Síran hlinito-sodný, Kamenec sodný
sl: E521, Natrijev aluminijev sulfat, Soda alum
sv: E521, Aluminiumnatriumsulfat, Sodaalun

en: E522, Aluminium potassium sulphate, Potassium alum, Potassium aluminium sulfate, potash alum
xx: E522
bg: E522, Алуминиевокалиев сулфат
ca: E522, Sulfat doble d'alumini i potassi
cs: E522, Síran draselno-hlinitý, Kamenec hlinitodraselný, Síran draselnohlinitý, Kamenec draselno-hlinitý, Kamenec draselnohlinitý, Síran hlinitodraselný, Kamenec hlinito-draselný, Síran hlinito-draselný, E 522
da: E522, Aluminiumkaliumsulfat
de: E522, Aluminiumkaliumsulfat, Kaliumalaun, Aluminiumkaliumsulfat-Dodecahydrat, Kaliumaluminiumsulfat-Dodecahydrat, Kaliumaluminiumsulfat, KAl(SO4)2, E 522, Kaliualaun, Alaun
el: E522, Θειικο αργιλιοκαλιο, Στυπτηρία καλίου
es: E522, Sulfato de aluminio y potasio, Alumbre de potasio, Alumbre potasico
et: E522, Alumiiniumkaaliumsulfaat, Maarjajää
fi: E522, Alumiinikaliumsulfaatti, Alumiinikaliumsulfaattia
fr: E522, Sulfate d'aluminium potassique, Alun de potassium, Alun
hu: E522, Alumínium-kálium-szulfát
it: E522, Solfato di alluminio e potassio, Allume di potassio, KAl(SO4)2·12H2O, Allume potassico, Solfato d'alluminio e potassio, Allume di rocca, Solfato doppio di alluminio e potassio dodecaidrato, Solfato di alluminio e potassio dodecaidrato
lt: E522, Aliuminio kalio sulfatas, Kalio alūnas
lv: E522, Alumīnija kālija sulfāts
mt: E522, Sulfat tal-aluminju u tal-potassju, Alum tal-potassju
nl: E522, Aluminiumkaliumsulfaat, Aluin, kaliumaluin
pl: E522, Siarczan glinowo-potasowy, Ałun potasu, siarczan glinu potasu, Siarczan potasowo-glinowy
pt: E522, Sulfato de alumínio e potássio, Alúmen de potássio, Alúmen de potassa, Pedra-ume
ro: E522, Sulfat de aluminiu și potasiu
sk: E522, Síran hlinito-draselný, Kamenec draselný
sl: E522, Kalijev aluminijev sulfat, kalijev galun, Galun
sv: E522, Aluminiumkaliumsulfat, Kalialun

en: E523, Aluminium ammonium sulphate, ammonium aluminium sulfate
xx: E523
bg: E523, Алуминиевоамониев сулфат
ca: E523, Sulfat doble d'alumini i amoni
cs: E523, Síran hlinito-amonný, Síran amonno-hlinitý
da: E523, Aluminiumammoniumsulfat
de: E523, Aluminiumammoniumsulfat, Aluminiumammoniumsulfat-Dodecahydrat, Deostein, Deokristall, Ammoniumaluminiumsulfat, Ammoniumalaun, Aluminium-Ammoniumsulfat, Ammoniumaluminiumsulfat-Dodecahydrat, NH4Al(SO4)2, E 523
el: E523, Θειικο αργιλιοαμμωνιο
es: E523, Sulfato de aluminio y amonio
et: E523, Aluminium ammonium sulphate
fi: E523, Alumiiniammoniumsulfaatti, Alumiiniammoniumsulfaattia
fr: E523, Sulfate d'aluminium ammonique
hu: E523, Alumínium-ammónium-szulfát
it: E523, Solfato di alluminio e ammonio, Allume di ammonio, Solfato di alluminio e ammonio dodecaidrato, NH4Al(SO4)2·12H2O
lt: E523, Aliuminio amonio sulfatas
lv: E523, Alumīnija amonija sulfāts
mt: E523, Sulfat tal-aluminju u tal-ammonju
nl: E523, Aluminiumammoniumsulfaat, Ammoniumaluin
pl: E523, Siarczan glinowo-amonowy, Siarczan amonu i glinu, Siarczan(VI) amonu i glinu, Dodekahydrat siarczanu amonowo-glinowego, Siarczan amonowo-glinowy
pt: E523, Sulfato de alumínio e amónio, Alúmen de amônio
ro: E523, Sulfat de aluminiu și amoniu
sk: E523, Síran hlinitoamónny
sl: E523, Amonijev aluminijev sulfat
sv: E523, Aluminiumammoniumsulfat

en: E524, Sodium hydroxide, Caustic soda
xx: E524
af: E524, Natriumhidroksied
ar: E524, هيدروكسيد الصوديوم
bg: E524, Натриев хидроксид, Сода каустик, натриева основа
bn: E524, সোডিয়াম হাইড্রোক্সাইড
bs: E524, Natrij-hidroksid
ca: E524, Hidròxid de sodi, hidroxid de sodi
cs: E524, Hydroxid sodný, Kaustická soda, Louh sodný
da: E524, Natriumhydroxid, Kaustisk soda, Ætsnatron, Natronlud
de: E524, Natriumhydroxid, Ätznatron, Natriumoxydhydrat, Natronhydrat, Ätzsoda, Kaustisches Soda
el: E524, Υδροξειδιο του νατριου, Καυστική σόδα, Καυστικό νάτριο, Νάτριο υδροξείδιο
eo: E524, natria hidroksido
es: E524, Hidróxido sódico, Sosa cáustica, Hidróxido de sodio, Soda caustica, Cloro sosa, hidrato de sodio
et: E524, Naatriumhüdroksiid, Kaustiline sooda, Seebikivi
eu: E524, sodio hidroxido
fa: E524, سدیم هیدروکسید
fi: E524, Natriumhydroksidi, Kaustinen sooda, Lipeä, Lipeäkivi, Natronlipeä, Natriumhydroksidia, Kaustista soodaa, Lipeää, Lipeäkiveä, Natronlipeää
fr: E524, Hydroxyde de sodium, Soude caustique, Lessive de soude
ga: E524, hiodrocsaíd sóidiam
gl: E524, Hidróxido de sodio
gv: E524, Hydrocseed sodjum
he: E524, נתרן הידרוקסידי
hi: E524, क्षारातु उदजारेय
hr: E524, natrijev hidroksid
hu: E524, Nátrium-hidroxid, Lúg
hy: E524, Նատրիումի հիդրօքսիդ
id: E524, Natrium hidroksida
it: E524, Idrossido di sodio, Soda caustica, Sodio idrato, Idrato di sodio
ja: E524, 水酸化ナトリウム
ka: E524, ნატრიუმის ჰიდროქსიდი
kk: E524, Натрий гидроксиді
ko: E524, 수산화 나트륨
ky: E524, Натрий гидроксиди
la: E524, Natrii hydroxidum
lt: E524, Natrio hidroksidas, Šarminė soda, Kaustinė soda, Natrio šarmas
lv: E524, Nātrija hidroksīds, Kaustiskā soda, Kodīgais nātrijs, Nātrija sārms, Ziepju zāles
mk: E524, Натриум хидроксид
ml: E524, സോഡിയം ഹൈഡ്രോക്സൈഡ്
mn: E524, Натрийн гидроксид
ms: E524, Natrium hidroksida
mt: E524, Idrossidu tas-sodju, Soda kawstika
my: E524, ကော့စတစ်ဆိုဒါ
nb: E524, Natriumhydroksid
nl: E524, Natriumhydroxide, Bijtende soda, Destop, Caustic soda, Naoh, Caustische soda
oc: E524, Idroxid de sòdi
pl: E524, Wodorotlenek sodu, Soda kaustyczna, soda żrąca, Zasada sodowa, Ług sodowy
pt: E524, Hidróxido de sódio, Soda cáustica
ro: E524, Hidroxid de sodiu, Sodă caustică, Leșie
ru: E524, гидроксид натрия
sh: E524, Natrijum hidroksid
sk: E524, Hydroxid sodný, Nehasená sóda
sl: E524, Natrijev hidroksid, kavstična soda
so: E524, Sodium Hydroxide
sq: E524, Hidroksidi i natriumit
sr: E524, натријум-хидроксид
sv: E524, Natriumhydroxid, Kaustiksoda, Natronlut, Kaustik soda, Natriumhydrooxid, Na-hydroxid
ta: E524, சோடியம் ஐதராக்சைடு
te: E524, సోడియమ్ హైడ్రాక్సైడ్
th: E524, โซดาไฟ
tr: E524, Sodyum hidroksit
uk: E524, гідроксид натрію
ur: E524, کاسٹک سوڈا
uz: E524, Natriy gidroksid
vi: E524, Natri hiđroxit

en: E525, Potassium hydroxide
xx: E525
af: E525, Kaliumhidroksied
ar: E525, هيدروكسيد البوتاسيوم
bg: E525, Калиев хидроксид
bn: E525, পটাসিয়াম হাইড্রোক্সাইড
bs: E525, Kalij hidroksid
ca: E525, Hidròxid de potassi, hydroxid de potassi
cs: E525, Hydroxid draselný, Louh draselný
da: E525, Kaliumhydroxid
de: E525, Kaliumhydroxid, Kaliumoxidhydrat, Kaustisches Kali, Kaliumhydrat, Ätzkali, Kalihydrat, E 525
el: E525, Υδροξειδιο του καλιου
eo: E525, Kalia hidroksido
es: E525, Hidróxido potásico, Hidróxido de potasio
et: E525, Kaaliumhüdroksiid
eu: E525, Potasio hidroxido
fa: E525, پتاسیم هیدروکسید
fi: E525, Kaliumhydroksidi, Kaliumhydroksidia
fr: E525, Hydroxyde de potassium
gl: E525, Hidróxido de potasio
he: E525, אשלגן הידרוקסידי
hi: E525, पोटासियम हाइड्राक्साइड
hr: E525, kalijev hidroksid
hu: E525, Kálium-hidroxid
hy: E525, Կալիումի հիդրօքսիդ
id: E525, kalium hidroksida
it: E525, Idrossido di potassio, potassa caustica
ja: E525, 水酸化カリウム, 水酸化K, 水酸化Ｋ
ka: E525, კალიუმის ჰიდროქსიდი
ko: E525, 수산화 칼륨
ky: E525, Калий гидроксиди
la: E525, Hydroxidum kalii
lt: E525, Kalio hidroksidas, Kalio šarmas
lv: E525, Kālija hidroksīds
mk: E525, Калиум хидроксид
ml: E525, പൊട്ടാസ്യം ഹൈഡ്രോക്സൈഡ്
mn: E525, Калийн гидроксид
ms: E525, Kalium hidroksida
mt: E525, Idrossidu tal-potassju
nb: E525, Kaliumhydroksid
nl: E525, Kaliumhydroxide, Bĳtende potas
pl: E525, Wodorotlenek potasu
pt: E525, Hidróxido de potássio
ro: E525, Hidroxid de potasiu
sh: E525, Kalijum hidroksid
sk: E525, Hydroxid draselný
sl: E525, Kalijev hidroksid
sr: E525, калијум-хидроксид
sv: E525, Kaliumhydroxid
ta: E525, பொட்டாசியம் ஐதராக்சைடு
th: E525, โพแทสเซียมไฮดรอกไซด์
tr: E525, Potasyum hidroksit
uk: E525, Гідроксид калію
vi: E525, Kali hiđroxit
zh: E525, 氢氧化钾

en: E526, Calcium hydroxide, Slaked lime
xx: E526
bg: E526, Калциев хидроксид, Гасена вар, Калциева основа, Калциев дихидроксид
ca: E526, Hidròxid de calci, hydroxid de calci
cs: E526, Hydroxid vápenatý, Vápenaté mléko, Hašené vápno, Vápenné mléko, Vápenný hydrát, Vápenná voda
da: E526, Calciumhydroxid, Læsket kalk, Kalciumhydroxid, Tørlæsket kalk, Kalkvand
de: E526, Calciumhydroxid, gelöschter Kalk, Kalkhydrat, Calciumlauge, Calciumdihydroxid, Kalziumhydroxid, Löschkalk, Hydratkalk
el: E526, Υδροξειδιο του ασβεστιου, Σβησμένη άσβεστος
es: E526, Hidróxido de calcio, Hidróxido cálcico, Cal apagada, Cal muerta
et: E526, Kaltsiumhüdroksiid, Kustutatud lubi
fi: E526, Kalsiumhydroksidi, Kalsiumdihydroksidi, Sammutettu kalkki, Kalsiumhydraatti, Kalsiumhydroksidia, Kalsiumdihydroksidia, Sammutettua kalkkia, Kalsiumhydraattia
fr: E526, Hydroxyde de calcium, Chaux éteinte, chaux hydratée
hu: E526, Kalcium-hidroxid, Oltott mész
it: E526, Idrossido di calcio, Gesso di Firenze, Bianco di Firenze, Latte di calce, Calce spenta, Ca(OH)2, Grassello di calce, Calcio idrato, Bianco di calce, Calce idrata, Idrato di calcio, Acqua di calce
lt: E526, Kalcio hidroksidas, Gesintos kalkės, Kalcio šarmas
lv: E526, Kalcija hidroksīds, Dzēstie kaļķi, Veldzētie kaļķi, Dzēstais kaļķis
mt: E526, Idrossidu tal-kalċju, Ġir bl-ilma
nl: E526, Calciumhydroxide, Gebluste kalk, Kalkmelk, Calciumdihydroxide, Kalkwater
pl: E526, Wodorotlenek wapnia, Wapno gaszone, Wapno lasowane
pt: E526, Hidróxido de cálcio, Cal apagada, Cal hidratada
ro: E526, Hidroxid de calciu, Var stins
ru: E526, Гидроксид кальция, Гашеная известь, Кальция гидроксид, Известковое молоко, Кальция гидроокись, Ca(OH)2, Известковая вода, Пушонка
sk: E526, Hydroxid vápenatý, Hasené vápno, Vápenné mlieko
sl: E526, Kalcijev hidroksid, gašeno apno
sv: E526, Kalciumhydroxid, Släckt kalk

en: E527, Ammonium hydroxide, Aqua ammonia, ammonia, household ammonia, ammonia water, ammonical liquor, ammonia liquor, aqueous ammonia
xx: E527
bg: E527, Амониев хидроксид, Амонячна вода
ca: E527, Hidròxid d'amoni, hydroxid d'amoni
cs: E527, Hydroxid amonný, Amoniak, čpavek
da: E527, Ammoniumhydroxid, Ammoniakvand, Salmiakspiritus, Salmiak spiritus
de: E527, Ammoniumhydroxid, Ammoniakwasser, NH4OH, E 527, Salmiakgeist, Ammoniaklösung
el: E527, Υδροξειδιο του αμμωνιου, Υγρή αμμωνία
es: E527, Hidróxido amónico, Agua amoniacal, hidróxido de amonio, E 527
et: E527, Ammooniumhüdroksiid, Ammoniaagivesi, ammoniaakvesi
fi: E527, Ammoniumhydroksidi, Ammoniumhydroksidia
fr: E527, Hydroxyde d'ammonium, Liqueur ammoniacale, ammoniaque, NH4OH, E 527, 1336-21-6
hu: E527, Ammónium-hidroxid, Vizes ammónia
it: E527, Idrossido di ammonio, idrossido d'ammonio, NH4OH, ammonio idrato
lt: E527, Amonio hidroksidas, Amoniakinis vanduo
lv: E527, Amonija hidroksīds, Amonjaka ūdens
mt: E527, Idrossidu tal-ammonju, Aqua ammonia
nl: E527, Ammoniumhydroxide, Ammonia, NH4OH, Salmiakgeest
pl: E527, Wodorotlenek amonu, Woda amoniakalna, Zasada amonowa
pt: E527, Ammonium hydroxide, Amónia, Hidróxido de amônio, NH4OH
ro: E527, Hidroxid de amoniu, Apă amoniacală, Hidroxidul de amoniu
sk: E527, Hydroxid amónny, Čpavková voda, Čpavok
sl: E527, Amonijev hidroksid, amoniak
sv: E527, Ammoniumhydroxid, Ammoniaklösning, E 527